District of Columbia statutes.
23-324

Subornation of perjury.

In every information or indictment for subornation of perjury, or for corrupt bargaining or contracting with others to commit perjury, it shall be sufficient to set forth the substance of the offense charged upon the defendant, without setting forth the bill, answer, information, indictment, declaration, or any part of any record or proceeding either in law or equity, and without setting forth the commission or authority of the court, or person or persons before whom the perjury was committed, or was agreed or promised to be committed, any law, usage, or custom to the contrary notwithstanding.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 612, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)
May 10, 2005, D.C. Law 15-356, § 3(a)(1), 52 DCR 1176
1981 Ed., § 23-324.
1973 Ed., § 23-324.
D.C. Law 15-356, in the section heading, substituted “subornation” for ’subordination“.